Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 1

Commission on Aging and Disability

71-2-101. Short title.

This part may be cited and shall be known as the “Tennessee Commission on Aging and Disability Act of 2001.”

Acts 1981, ch. 428, § 2; 1982, ch. 834, § 2; T.C.A., §14-6-101; Acts 2001, ch. 397, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. The former chapter (title 14, ch. 6) (Acts 1963, ch. 233, §§ 1-9; 1967, ch. 231, §§ 1, 2; 1975, ch. 30, § 1; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(4); 1977, ch. 378, § 1; T.C.A. 14-1701 — 14-1710), concerning the commission on aging, was repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 428, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Senior Moments: Protecting Older Adults From Financial Exploitation: Proposed Federal Laws and Regulations, 52 Tenn. B.J. 26 (2016).

71-2-102. Purposes of part.

The purposes of this part are to provide a comprehensive and coordinated service system for the state's aging population, giving high priority to those persons in greatest need, to conduct studies and research into the needs and problems of the aging, and to provide a system of home and community based long-term care services that is responsive to the needs of all Tennesseans regardless of age, disability, or economic status.

Acts 1981, ch. 428, § 3; 1982, ch. 834, § 3; T.C.A., §14-6-102; Acts 2001, ch. 397, § 3.

71-2-103. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Area agency on aging” means any agency that has been designated by the commission to plan for and provide services to the elderly and disabled within a defined geographic area;

“Commission” means the commission on aging and disability;

“Home and community based long term care” means supportive services, including, but not limited to, personal assistance, homemaker and chore services, adult day services, assistive technology, home delivered meals, assisted transportation and mobility services, respite and hospice care, and rehabilitative care, that are provided to older persons and individuals with disabilities to remain independent and avoid inappropriate institutionalization and that help individuals maintain physical, social, and spiritual independence in the least restrictive environment;

“Older Americans Act” means the Older Americans Act of 1965, as amended (42 U.S.C. § 3001 et seq.); and

“Planning and service area” means a geographical division of the state that serves as an administrative unit for the purpose of planning and delivering services to older persons.

Acts 1981, ch. 428, § 4; 1982, ch. 834, § 4; T.C.A., §14-6-103; Acts 2001, ch. 397, § 4.

71-2-104. Creation and composition of commission — Terms of office.

There is hereby created a commission known as the Tennessee commission on aging and disability, which shall plan, develop, and administer projects, programs, services and state and federal funds designated for, and relating to, disabled adults and older persons in this state, including those sponsored by the federal government, when such projects, programs and services are not the specific responsibility of another state agency pursuant to some other federal or state law. The commission shall be designated as the sole state agency to plan and administer all state activities related to and authorized under the Older Americans Act (42 U.S.C. § 3001 et seq.), except for Title V activities under the Older Americans Act (42 U.S.C. § 3056 et seq.), which shall be administered by the department of labor and workforce development.

The commission shall consist of twenty-two (22) members, who shall be persons who provide leadership in programs for the elderly and disabled in the state. Nineteen (19) of the members shall be appointed by the governor, in accordance with this part. Members may come from such diverse areas as housing, recreation, employment, medicine, nursing, social service, business, adult education, long-term care, religion, research and advocacy. It is desirable that the commission membership reflect the geographic diversity of the state, and include minorities and women at least in proportion to their presence in the state's population and that at least one half (½) of the membership be representative of the population served. Staff members of programs funded wholly or in part by the commission shall be ineligible to serve as commission members.

Members of the commission shall be appointed as follows:

One (1) person shall be appointed by the governor from each of the nine (9) planning and service areas, in consultation with each of the nine (9) advisory councils to the nine (9) area agencies on aging. The governor may appoint such persons from a list of two (2) persons nominated by each advisory council to the nine (9) area agencies on aging. In making these appointments, the governor shall strive to achieve adequate representation from both rural and urban areas. Nothing shall preclude members of the advisory councils from being appointed as commission members;

One (1) member of the governor's personal staff, who shall be appointed by the governor;

One (1) person who is an active member of a chartered, statewide organization that advocates exclusively for older persons shall be appointed by the governor. Each such organization may submit two (2) nominations for consideration by the governor;

One (1) person who is an active member of a federally chartered organization with statewide membership and chapters chartered in this state, that advocates exclusively for older persons, shall be appointed by the governor. Each such organization may submit two (2) nominations for consideration by the governor;

One (1) person who is an active member of a chartered, statewide organization that advocates exclusively for disabled persons shall be appointed by the governor. Each such organization may submit two (2) nominations for consideration by the governor;

The commissioners of human services, health, veterans services, mental health and substance abuse services, and intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the director of TennCare or their designees;

The executive director of the council on developmental disabilities; and

The speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives each shall name one (1) legislator from such speaker's respective house to serve on the commission as ex officio members without voting power to attend and sit with the commission in open meetings, in order to report back to the general assembly on actions being taken or considered by the commission.

The governor may ask the nominating body in any case for additional nominees.

As vacancies occur on the commission, persons shall be appointed to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term, in accordance with the original nomination process.

Members appointed to serve on the commission pursuant to this section shall be appointed in accordance with the criteria established in this section. Members of the commission as it existed prior to October 1, 2012, may be eligible for nomination and appointment pursuant to the criteria established in this section.

The terms of office for members of the commission shall be six (6) years, except for members of the governor's personal staff and cabinet whose terms shall be coterminous with that of the appointing governor, and except for the legislators appointed pursuant to subdivision (c)(1)(H) whose terms shall be coterminous with the terms for which they have been elected to the general assembly. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment pursuant to the criteria in this section only for the remainder of the unexpired term.

A two-year absence from commission membership qualifies any member for reappointment following the criteria of this section.

Acts 1981, ch. 428, § 5; 1982, ch. 834, § 5; 1984, ch. 943, § 2; T.C.A., §14-6-104; Acts 2001, ch. 397, § 5; 2003, ch. 311, § 1; 2010, ch. 1100, §§ 133, 134; 2012, ch. 575, § 2; 2012, ch. 986, §§ 12-14; 2015, ch. 24, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee commission on aging and disability, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2026. See §§4-29-112,4-29-247.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.

Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

Attorney General Opinions. Legislative authority to limit commission's discretion, OAG 98-102, 199 Tenn. AG LEXIS 102 (5/27/98).

71-2-105. Powers and duties of commission.

The commission shall:

Meet as necessary to transact business; provided, that meetings shall be held at least quarterly;

Promulgate bylaws to provide for the election of officers, establishment of committees, meetings, and other matters relating to commission functions;

Elect a chair, a vice chair, and three (3) representatives, one (1) from each of the three (3) grand divisions, who shall comprise the executive committee to function between quarterly meetings;

Allocate funds for projects and programs for older persons and disabled adults, subject to the limits of the appropriation by the general assembly and funds available or received from the federal government for such projects and programs. The commission is authorized to accept funds from the federal government and private sources and to administer such funds to achieve its purposes pursuant to § 71-2-104(a);

Serve as an advocate within government and in the community for older persons and disabled adults in Tennessee;

Designate planning and service areas and area agencies on aging in accordance with the Older Americans Act (42 U.S.C. § 3001 et seq.), and federal regulations promulgated under the Older Americans Act. The commission shall review the boundaries of the planning and service areas from time to time and shall change them as necessary to comply with the Older Americans Act or to reflect changes in governmental boundaries or major changes in population distribution;

Adopt the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, for the purpose of administrative hearings and rulemaking as required under this part;

Receive the cooperation of other state departments and agencies in carrying out the policies and objectives of this part;

Enter into such contracts and make such grants within the limits of appropriated funds, as are necessary or appropriate under this part, and in a manner consistent with state or federal law;

Make available to older persons information concerning the nutritional benefits of eating garden produce to promote participation by older persons in community gardens, as defined in § 43-24-102; and

Provide to the general assembly, no later than January 15 of each year, an updated report and analysis of the waiting list for the state options program.

In addition to the powers, responsibilities or duties granted to the commission elsewhere in this part, the commission may:

Promulgate, amend, revise, and rescind such rules as are necessary and appropriate to carry out the purposes of this part in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, including rules necessary for the proper management and oversight of the home and community based options program;

Notwithstanding § 71-5-1419(c), promulgate rules and regulations allocating resources between urban and rural areas to program components that provide services to elderly and disabled individuals in need of assistance who do not qualify for long-term care services under the Medical Assistance Act of 1968, compiled in chapter 5, part 1 of this title;

Create subcommittees to undertake such special studies as it shall authorize and include in such subcommittees persons qualified in any field of activity relating to aging or disability, or both;

Advise the governor and the heads of state departments and agencies regarding policies, programs, services, allocation of funds, and the needs of older persons and disabled adults in Tennessee and make recommendations for legislative action to the governor and to the general assembly;

Hold hearings, conduct research and other appropriate activities to determine the needs of older persons and disabled adults in the state, including particularly, but not limited to, their needs for health and social services, and to determine the existing services and facilities, private and public, available to meet those needs;

Develop and conduct, alone or in coordination with other agencies, research and demonstration projects and programs that provide training, education, and services to advance the interests of older persons and disabled adults;

Stimulate more effective use of existing resources and services for older persons and disabled adults and develop programs, opportunities and services that are not otherwise provided for older persons and disabled adults, with the aim of developing a comprehensive and coordinated system for the delivery of health and social services; and

Conduct, develop, and implement, alone or in coordination with other agencies, research, pilot projects, and programs designed to promote and encourage healthy aging.

In addition to the powers, responsibilities, and duties granted to the commission, the commission shall operate an outreach and counseling program through the state health insurance assistance program (SHIP) to provide state residents with information, education, and counseling relative to:

Medicare;

TennCare;

Medicare supplement insurance;

Enrollment in the medicare prescription drug plan (Part D), and the accompanying low-income subsidy;

Finding help with the cost of prescription drugs during coverage gaps and access to drugs not covered under Part D;

Medicare advantage options;

Long-term care planning and insurance;

Claims and billing problem resolution, information, and referral on public benefit programs;

Employer and retiree health insurance options for those with medicare and veterans benefits; and

Other military health insurance for those with medicare.

Minimally, such outreach shall include:

A program to assist medicare-eligible persons in processing the necessary documents in order to participate in the programs in subdivision (c)(1);

A toll-free number staffed during business hours to provide information regarding the programs in subdivision (c)(1);

A website or referral to website links that provide information regarding the programs in subdivision (c)(1); and

Presentations to senior groups regarding the availability of the programs in subdivision (c)(1).

The commission shall implement the outreach program within the commission's available resources.

The commission may delegate any or all such responsibilities to a private or public contractor.

The commission is authorized to make application for grants to fund programs set forth in subdivision (c)(1).

The commission may adopt rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to implement this subsection (c).

Nothing in this part or the Long-Term Care Community Choices Act of 2008, compiled in chapter 5, part 14 of this title, shall authorize the commission to exercise any control or authority over any aspect of the administration of programs for home and community-based long-term care services that were operating on the basis of federal waivers in effect on June 19, 2001.

Acts 1981, ch. 428, § 6; 1982, ch. 834, § 6; 1984, ch. 943, § 3; T.C.A., §14-6-105; Acts 2001, ch. 397, § 6; 2002, ch. 703, § 1; 2012, ch. 986, § 15; 2013, ch. 236, § 58; 2014, ch. 556, § 5; 2015, ch. 461, § 1; 2016, ch. 690, §§ 1-4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Review of administrative plans and rules by commission on aging, §4-3-123.

71-2-106. Reimbursement for expenses of commission members.

Members of the commission shall receive no compensation for their services other than a reimbursement for traveling and other expense incurred in the attendance of meetings required by this part or other meetings authorized by the commission. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1981, ch. 428, § 7; 1982, ch. 834, § 7; 1984, ch. 943, § 4; T.C.A., §14-6-106; Acts 2001, ch. 397, § 7.

71-2-107. Executive director.

The governor shall appoint the executive director. The executive director shall be the chief administrative officer of the commission. The director shall be a full-time employee of the commission and shall have such education as deemed necessary by the governor, with a minimum of five (5) years' experience in the fields of aging or disability or administrative experience necessary to properly operate and manage the programs under this part. The executive director shall have the authority to conduct ordinary and necessary business in the name of the commission in accordance with this part and as determined by the commission from time to time.

The executive director shall:

Be available to serve or be represented on state level committees or bodies where the purpose of that state body or committee is concerned with the general health, education or welfare of the citizens of Tennessee when older persons or disabled adults are affected by the decisions of that body;

Develop, as required under the Older Americans Act (42 U.S.C. §§ 3001 et seq.), a plan for state programs, services and activities for older persons, to be updated periodically;

Supervise the expenditure of funds and be responsible for complying with all applicable provisions of state and federal law in the receipt of and disbursement of funds;

Serve as an advocate within government and in the community for older persons and disabled adults in Tennessee;

Recommend to the commission such rules as are necessary and appropriate to carry out the purposes of this part;

Employ or contract for the services of experts and technical consultants as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this part;

Conduct evaluations and prepare reports in accordance with the terms of the Older Americans Act and other state and federal laws;

Within the limits of appropriated funds, employ such personnel as may be required to carry out this part. The executive director shall appoint and may remove all such personnel in accordance with the state service system; and

Provide staff support to the commission.

Acts 1981, ch. 428, § 8; 1982 ch. 834, § 8; 1984, ch. 943, § 5; T.C.A., §14-6-107; Acts 2001, ch. 397, § 8; 2012, ch. 800, § 49; 2012, ch. 986, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 800, § 1 provided that the act, which amended subdivision (b)(8), shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Excellence, Accountability, and Management (T.E.A.M.) Act of 2012.”

Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.

71-2-108. Direct or conflicting interests.

If any matter before the commission involves a project, transaction, or relationship in which a member or a member's associated institution, business or agency has a direct or a conflicting interest, the member shall make known to the commission that interest and shall be excused from the proceedings.

Acts 1981, ch. 428, § 10; 1982, ch. 834, § 11; 1984, ch. 943, § 6; T.C.A., §§14-6-109,71-2-109; Acts 2001, ch. 397, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-2-108, formerly §14-6-108 (Acts 1981 ch. 428, § 9; 1982, ch. 834, § 9), concerning the governor's advisory council on aging, was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 943, § 1.

71-2-109. Long-term care ombudsman — State office — Personnel.

Within the commission there shall be an established office of the state long-term care ombudsman, referred to as “the office” in this section, which shall carry out those functions delineated in § 307(a)(12) of the Older Americans Act (42 U.S.C. § 3027(a)(12)).

The office shall designate and contract with, either directly or through the area agency on aging, a local grantee to establish and operate a local ombudsman program in each of the designated planning and service areas. Each local ombudsman program shall carry out the duties of the office in each area through paid staff and trained volunteers. For the purposes of carrying out those duties, and only to the extent required by § 307(a)(12)(H)(vi) of the Older Americans Act (former 42 U.S.C. § 3027(a)(12)(H)(vi) [repealed]), each local program unit will be considered to be a “subdivision” of the office; provided, that this shall have no effect upon the character of local government or private agencies or corporations, and they shall not be considered to be agencies of this state.

Paid staff and volunteers shall be trained as required by and under the supervision of the office, which shall certify those persons who have been properly trained as “representatives” of the office; provided, that local program employees and volunteers shall not be considered to be employees of this state. The office shall maintain a current listing of certified representatives. Certified representatives shall be immune from liability for acts or omissions committed within the scope of their assigned duties, except for willful, malicious, or criminal acts or omissions or for acts or omissions done for personal gain.

Acts 1989, ch. 353, § 1; T.C.A., §71-2-111; Acts 2001, ch. 397, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-2-109, concerning conflicts of interest, was transferred to §71-2-108 in 2001.

71-2-110. Congregate meal sites.

The standards and procedures developed by the commission relative to the nutrition program for older persons operated in accordance with the Older Americans Act of 1965 (42 U.S.C. § 3001 et seq.), shall establish a threshold of an annual average of ten (10) congregate and home-delivered meals a day for any nutrition sites.

Acts 1997, ch. 436, § 1; T.C.A., §71-2-112; Acts 2001, ch. 397, § 11; 2015, ch. 461, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-2-110, formerly §14-6-110 (Acts 1977, ch. 378, § 1; T.C.A. § 14-1710), concerning senior citizens' center, was repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 428, § 1, and thus was not transferred to title 71 with the rest of this part in 1987.

Attorney General Opinions. This section not in conflict with state or federal law, OAG 98-102, 199 Tenn. AG LEXIS 102 (5/27/98).

Legislative authority to limit commission's discretion, OAG 98-102, 199 Tenn. AG LEXIS 102 (5/27/98).

71-2-111. Verification of individual background information and performance of criminal history background check of employees and volunteers.

The commission shall require its contractors, grantees, and subcontractors to verify individual background information for newly hired employees and volunteers who provide direct care for, have direct contact with, or have direct responsibility for the safety and care of disabled or elderly persons in their homes.

The commission shall promulgate rules that develop standard procedures specifying minimum requirements applicable to verifying individual background information or performing a criminal history background check of all paid or volunteer in-home care providers for vulnerable elderly and disabled persons. The commission is expressly authorized to promulgate such rules as emergency rules pursuant to § 4-5-208(a)(4) to provide an immediate effective date.

If the criminal history background check is conducted by the Tennessee bureau of investigation or the federal bureau of investigation, it shall be conducted by the submission of fingerprint cards to the Tennessee bureau of investigation or the federal bureau of investigation. Any cost incurred by the Tennessee bureau of investigation or the federal bureau of investigation shall be paid by the organization requesting such investigation and information. If a criminal history background check is conducted by the Tennessee bureau of investigation or the federal bureau of investigation, the payment of such costs shall be made in the amounts established by § 38-6-103.

Acts 2001, ch. 397, § 12; 2009, ch. 566, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 12 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to public necessity rules, wherever such references appear in this code, to emergency rules, as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

Former §71-2-111, concerning the long-term care ombudsman office, was transferred to §71-2-109 in 2001.

71-2-112. Working group to provide draft of field guide for law enforcement — Statutes and resources related to assisting in prevention, investigation, and prosecution of abuse.

The executive director of the commission shall establish a working group that is led by the commission and includes the division of adult protective services of the department of human services, the department of health, the district attorneys general conference, members of local law enforcement, and other state departments and agencies as may be needed. The working group shall draft and develop a field guide to provide law enforcement in this state with the specific statutes and other resources related to assisting in the prevention, investigation, and prosecution of abuse under chapter 6, part 1 of this title.

Acts 2016, ch. 1044, § 5.

71-2-113. Establishment of collaborative coalition.

The executive director of the commission shall establish and lead a multidisciplinary collaborative coalition of state agencies and departments involved in the prevention, investigation, and prosecution of elder and vulnerable adult abuse, neglect, and exploitation. In an effort to reduce this abuse, neglect, and exploitation, the coalition shall develop and undertake strategies to increase communication with the public and state agencies, propose educational outreach, and promote the sharing of existing resources and information.

Acts 2016, ch. 1044, § 6.

71-2-114. Tennessee vulnerable adult coalition (TVAC).

There is established the Tennessee vulnerable adult coalition (TVAC) as an advisory entity. The coalition shall be administratively attached to the commission on aging and disability. This coalition shall be convened by the executive director of the commission. The executive director shall invite appropriate entities to participate on a volunteer basis. The coalition shall bring public and private entities in this state together to promote the collaboration necessary to prevent the abuse, neglect, and financial exploitation of elder and vulnerable adults.

Acts 2016, ch. 1044, § 7.

71-2-115. Inventory of funding sources — Report — Updates.

The commission shall design and oversee a resource mapping of all federal and state funding sources and funding streams as well as resources for nonprofit and other nongovernmental entities that support the health, safety, and welfare of older adults in this state who are sixty (60) years of age or older. The resource mapping shall include, but not be limited to:

An inventory of all federal and state funding sources that support these older adults in this state;

An inventory of all state, federal, or government subsidized services and programs offered to these older adults in this state, set out by program, target population, geographical region, agency, or any other grouping that would assist the general assembly in determining whether there are overlapping programs that lead to duplication within the state, gaps in service delivery, and any administrative inefficiencies generally;

A description of the manner in which the funds are being used within the agencies or organizations, the performance measures in place to assess the use of such funding, and the intended outcomes of the programs and services;

Government mandates for the use of the funds, if any; and

An inventory of the funds for which the state may be eligible, but is currently not receiving or using, and the reasons why the funds are not being used.

The commission shall update the report each year and shall subsequently assure that the resource map is periodically and timely updated, so as to maintain a current resource map of the funds used to support these older adults in the state.

The comptroller of the treasury and each department of state government or agency in this state shall provide assistance upon request to the commission in effectuating the purpose of this section.

On or before January 15, 2019, the commission shall provide a preliminary report to the health and welfare committee of the senate and the health committee of the house of representatives. On or before December 15, 2020, and each successive year thereafter, the commission shall provide a full report to the health and welfare committee of the senate and the health committee of the house of representatives. The full report shall include, but not be limited to, the resource map and any recommendations, including proposed legislation, for improving the efficiency and effectiveness of programs offered to older adults who are sixty (60) years of age or older in this state.

Acts 2018, ch. 548, § 1.

71-2-116. State palliative care and quality of life council.

As used in this section:

“Commission” means the Tennessee commission on aging and disability;

“Council” means the state palliative care and quality of life council;

“Executive director” shall mean the executive director of the Tennessee commission on aging and disability; and

“Palliative care” means an approach that improves the quality of life of patients and their families facing the problems associated with chronic life- threatening illness, through the prevention and relief of suffering by means of early identification and assessment and treatment of pain and other problems, physical, psychosocial, and spiritual. Palliative care includes, but is not limited to:

Discussions involving a patient's goals for treatment;

Discussions involving treatment options that are appropriate to the patient, including, where appropriate, hospice care; and

Comprehensive pain and symptom management.

The state palliative care and quality of life council is established.

The purpose of the council is to continually assess the current status of palliative care in the state and to review the barriers that exist that prevent such care from being obtained and utilized by the people who could benefit from such care. The council shall provide recommendations to the governor and to the general assembly on issues related to its work.

The council membership shall be appointed by the executive director, after consulting with Tennessee Hospice Association, Tennessee Hospital Association, Tennessee Medical Association, Tennessee Nursing Association, Tennessee Health Care Association, Tennessee Association of Home Care, and the Tennessee Chapter of American Cancer Society, and shall include interdisciplinary palliative care medical, nursing, social work, pharmacy, and spiritual professional expertise; patient and family caregiver advocate representation; and any other relevant appointees the executive director determines appropriate. The council shall consist of no more than eleven (11) members. The executive director shall consider the racial, geographic, urban/rural, and economic diversity of the state when appointing members. Membership shall specifically include health professionals having palliative care work experience or expertise in palliative care delivery models in a variety of inpatient, outpatient, and community settings such as acute care, long-term care, and hospice, and with a variety of populations, including pediatric, youth, and adult. At least one (1) council member shall be a board-certified hospice and palliative medicine physician, at least one (1) council member shall be a licensed certified registered nurse practitioner with expertise in palliative care, and one (1) council member shall be from the department of health. Council members shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years. The members shall elect a chair and vice chair, whose duties shall be established by the council. The council shall fix a time and place for regular meetings and shall meet no less than twice yearly.

Council members shall receive no compensation for their services or travel reimbursement for attending meetings.

The council shall consult with and advise the executive director on matters related to the establishment, maintenance, and operation of palliative care initiatives in this state.

The commission shall provide administrative support to the council.

By January 15 of 2020, and by January 15 of each subsequent year, the council shall submit a report to the general assembly that addresses barriers to palliative care access, analyzes service utilization data, and provides recommendations and best practices to address gaps in service.

Acts 2018, ch. 955, § 2; 2020, ch. 561, § 3.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2018, ch. 955, § 2 purported to enact §71-2-115. Section71-2-115 was previously enacted by Acts 2018, ch. 548, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2018, ch. 955, § 2 was designated as §71-2-116 by the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. The state palliative care and quality of life council, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2027. See §§4-29-112,4-29-248.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “advisory” preceding “council” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 561, § 4. March 19, 2020.